Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5744.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings of fact.
(1) The demographic divide in which there are less bilingual, dual language and world
language teachers and more multilingual students is of growing public concern.
(2) Currently, multilingual students comprise twenty-seven percent (27%) of students in
Rhode Island’s urban core student population and sixteen percent (16%) of Rhode Island’s
statewide student population (Rhode Island Kids Count, 2024).
(3) Only two percent (2%) of multilingual learners are enrolled in dual language programs
and comprise a large portion of urban core and urban ring school students.
(5) A common explanation of why the demographic divide is so concerning is that
multilingual students benefit most from instruction from teachers that are certified in bilingual, dual
language and world language.
(6) More students benefiting from dual language instruction may, in turn, translate into
better academic outcomes such as student motivation, improved interest in academics, consistent
attendance, and grades.
(7) Bilingual, dual language and world language teachers represent excellent role models
and provide a continuous source of inspiration for not only multilingual students, but all students.
(8) Linguistic separation and isolation can be countered through significant investment in
bilingual, dual language and world language teachers that will deliver academic content through

multiple languages.
(9) Students learn important societal lessons through the example of cooperative interracial
and interethnic relationships among teachers.
(10) It is in the best interest of the state, its residents, and its students to develop and support
certified bilingual, dual language and world language teachers. The Rhode Island Blueprint for a
Multilingual Learner Success (2021) calls for a nimble system that "Secures and allocates human
and fiscal resources to support high-quality core instruction to meet the diverse needs of MLLs,
including professional learning opportunities for all teachers and administrators."
(11) Support for increased preparation and training of bilingual, dual language and world
language teachers can successfully be leveraged by providing direct financial support to public
institutions of higher education in Rhode Island working to increase the number of certified
bilingual, dual language and world language teachers.
SECTION 2. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
BILINGUAL AND DUAL LANGUAGE AND WORLD LANGUAGE TEACHERS
INVESTMENT ACT
16-117-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Bilingual and Dual Language and
World Language Teachers Investment Act".
16-117-2. Definitions.
When used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Bilingual and dual language educator" means a person who is certified by the
department of elementary and secondary education as a bilingual and dual language teacher in any
grade in accordance with the department of education regulation 200-RICR-20-20-1.
(2) "Eligible teacher" means a full-time teacher certified to teach in a kindergarten through
grade twelve (K-12) school by the department of elementary and secondary education and is
actively teaching within a public school located in the urban core or urban ring.
(3) "FAFSA" means the Free Application for Federal Student Aid form;
(4) “Initial teacher certification programs” means Rhode Island approved educator
preparation programs that lead to full initial certification in Rhode Island.
(5) "Mandatory fees and tuition" means the costs that every student is required to pay in
order to enroll in classes, and does not include room and board, textbooks, program fees that may
LC001118 - Page 2 of 7

exist in some majors, course fees that may exist for some specific courses, meal plans, or travel;
(6) "Multilingual adult" means an adult who has demonstrated advanced low or higher
proficiency in the target language of certification in accordance with the American Council on the
Teaching of Foreign Languages (ACTFL) proficiency scale through any of the approved Seal of
Biliteracy language proficiency assessments including, but not limited to: ACT, SAT, Advanced
Placement (English Language and Composition, English Literature and Composition, and World
Language), ACCESS, LAS Links (Form C/D), AAPPL, STAMP 4S, and ASLPI.
(7) "Multilingual learner" means a student who speaks a language other than English at
home.
(8) "Recipient student" means a college student attending Rhode Island College or the
University of Rhode Island enrolled in a certification program for world language or bilingual and
dual language and is awarded a scholarship pursuant to the provisions of § 16-117-4.
(9) "Recipient teacher" means an eligible teacher who is awarded a scholarship pursuant to
the provisions of § 16-117-6.
(10) "Scholarship" or "scholarship program" means the scholarship program that is
established pursuant to § 16-117-4 to promote and increase the quantity of bilingual, dual language
and world language teachers in urban core and urban ring public schools.
(11) "State" means the State of Rhode Island.
(12) "Urban core" means the municipalities of Providence, Pawtucket, Central Falls,
Woonsocket and Newport.
(13) "Urban ring" means the municipalities of Cranston, Warwick, West Warwick, North
Providence and East Providence.
(14) "World language educator" means a person who is certified by the department of
elementary and secondary education as an All Grades World Language teacher in accordance with
the department of education regulation 200-RICR-20-20-1.
16-117-3. Strategy to expand teaching certifications for bilingual dual language and
world language teachers.
The department of education is hereby empowered and directed to collaborate with the
office of the postsecondary commissioner and in consultation with Rhode Island college (RIC) and
the university of Rhode Island (URI) to increase and streamline the issuance of world language or
bilingual and dual language certifications in order to increase the number of bilingual and dual
language and world language teachers in urban core and urban ring public schools.
16-117-4. Scholarship program for college students.
(a) Beginning November 1, 2025, there is hereby established a scholarship program within
LC001118 - Page 3 of 7

the office of the postsecondary commissioner to promote and increase the number of bilingual, dual
language and world language teachers in urban core and urban ring public schools.
(b) The general assembly shall annually appropriate, commencing in fiscal year 2026, the
sum of five hundred thousand ($500,000) to implement the scholarship purposes of this chapter.
Additional funds beyond the scholarships may be appropriated to support and advance the
scholarship program established pursuant to the provisions of this section. In order to support
administrative, recruitment, and implementation efforts, an amount not to exceed fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) shall be used as discretionary funds by the office of the postsecondary
commissioner. Any unexpended discretionary funds shall revert to their original purpose of
providing scholarships. In addition to appropriations by the general assembly, charitable donations
may be accepted into the scholarship program.
(c) The office of the postsecondary commissioner, in conjunction with the financial aid
office at RIC and URI, shall administer the scholarship program for state residents seeking
bilingual, dual language or world language teacher certification who meet the eligibility
requirements in subsection (d) of this section.
(d) To be eligible for receipt of the scholarship, a student:
(1) Shall be pursuing a bilingual dual language or world language teacher certification as
part of the teacher preparation program at RIC or URI;
(2) Shall commit to work full-time as a teacher within one year of certification completion
at an urban core or urban ring public school in Rhode Island. The commitment to work full-time
shall extend to one year of teaching for each year the recipient received and accepted an award of
scholarship pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(3) Shall qualify for in-state tuition and fees pursuant to the residency policy adopted by
the council on postsecondary education, as amended, supplemented, restated, or otherwise modified
from time to time ("residency policy");
(4) Shall complete the FAFSA and any required FAFSA verification or the Rhode Island
alternative application for state postsecondary student financial assistance by the deadline
prescribed by RIC and URI for each year in which the student seeks to receive funding under the
scholarship program.
(5) Shall maintain an average annual cumulative grade point average (GPA) of 2.5 or
greater, as determined by RIC and URI;
(6) Shall commit to a repayment of all funds received by the scholarship program if the
recipient student fails to complete or comply with all requirements and provisions of this chapter.
(e) The office of the postsecondary commissioner, in conjunction with RIC and URI, shall
LC001118 - Page 4 of 7

develop a policy and procedure to secure the commitments referenced in § 16-117-4 from recipient
students.
(f) Every scholarship awarded pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be calculated
annually. Each applicant and/or recipient student shall complete the FAFSA and any required
FAFSA verification by the deadline prescribed by RIC and URI for each year of attendance. The
scholarship award shall cover the annual cost of mandatory fees and tuition, less federal and all
other financial aid monies available to the recipient student. Once awarded, the scholarship may
continue for a period of up to two (2) years conditioned on the recipient student's compliance with
the provisions of this section.
(g) All scholarships awarded pursuant to the provisions of this section are subject to
appropriation, and no applicant shall have a right to receive any scholarship pursuant to the
provisions of this section until awarded.
16-117-5. Scholarship award preference for college students.
In selecting recipient students of the scholarship established pursuant to § 16-117-4,
preference shall be given to the following applicants:
(1) Multilingual adults with a bachelor’s degree from the United States or abroad; or
(2) Multilingual adults enrolled in an initial teacher certification program.
16-117-6. Scholarship program for eligible teachers.
(a) Beginning November 1, 2025, there is hereby established a scholarship program within
the office of the postsecondary commissioner to promote and increase the number of bilingual, dual
language and world language teachers in urban core and urban ring public schools.
(b) The general assembly shall annually appropriate, commencing in fiscal year 2026, the
sum of five hundred thousand ($500,000) to implement the scholarship purposes of this chapter.
Additional funds beyond the scholarships may be appropriated to support and advance the
scholarship program established pursuant to the provisions of this section. In order to support
administrative, recruitment, and implementation efforts, an amount not to exceed fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) shall be used as discretionary funds by the office of the postsecondary
commissioner. Any unexpended discretionary funds shall revert to their original purpose of
providing scholarships. In addition to appropriation by the general assembly, charitable donations
may be accepted into the scholarship program.
(c) The office of the postsecondary commissioner, in conjunction with the financial aid
office at RIC and URI, shall administer the scholarship program for state residents seeking
bilingual, dual language or world language teacher certification who meet the eligibility
requirements in subsection (d) of this section.
LC001118 - Page 5 of 7

(d) To be eligible for receipt of the scholarship, an eligible teacher:
(1) Shall be actively teaching full-time at a kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12)
public school located in the urban core or urban ring.
(2) Shall already be certified in early childhood, elementary, middle grades, secondary
grades, or all grades by the department of elementary and secondary education in accordance with
the department of education regulation 200-RICR-20-20-1.
(3) Shall complete the FAFSA and any required FAFSA verification or the Rhode Island
alternative application for state postsecondary student financial assistance by the deadline
prescribed by RIC and URI for each year in which the student seeks to receive funding under the
scholarship program;
(3) Shall maintain an average annual cumulative grade point average (GPA) of 2.5 or
greater, as determined by RIC and URI;
(4) Shall commit to a repayment of all funds received by the scholarship program if the
recipient teacher fails to complete or comply with all requirements and provisions of this chapter.
(e) The office of the postsecondary commissioner, in conjunction with RIC and URI, shall
develop a policy and procedure to secure the commitments referenced in § 16-117-6 from eligible
teachers.
16-117-7. Promulgation of rules and procedure.
The office of the postsecondary commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and
regulations to effectuate the purpose of this chapter. In addition, RIC and URI shall establish appeal
procedures for the award, denial, repayment, or revocation of a scholarship award pursuant to the
provisions of §§ 16-117-4 and 16-117-6.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on November 1, 2025.
========
LC001118
========
LC001118 - Page 6 of 7